Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.470

Approval of certain applications prohibited.

The director shall not approve an application involving an offer for, an announcement thereof, or an acquisition of any security of a converted savings bank submitted under RCW 32.32.450 if the director finds that the offer frustrates the purposes of this chapter, is manipulative or deceptive, subverts the fairness of the conversion, is likely to result in injury to the savings bank, is not consistent with savings banking under Title 32 RCW, or is otherwise violative of law or regulation.

[ 1994 c 92 s 399; 1981 c 85 s 93.]